District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.133

Monopolies and restraint of trade.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 233, ch. 269, § 133
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.133.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.34.
1973 Ed., § 29-944.